ling073-lkt/apertium-lkt.lkt.twol
Alphabet
 A Á B C Č D E É G Ǧ H Ȟ I Í K L M N Ŋ O Ó P S Š T U Ú V W Y Z Ž
 a á b c č d e é g ǧ h ȟ i í k l m n ŋ o ó p s š t u ú v w y z ž

 %{A%}:a %>:0

 %{L1%}:0 %{infx%}:0
 %{L2%}:0
 %{L3%}:0
 %{L4%}:0 ;

Sets

Vowel = A Á E É I Í O Ó U Ú 
        a á e é i í o ó u ú ;

Letters = A Á B C Č D E É G Ǧ H Ȟ I Í K L M N Ŋ O Ó P S Š T U Ú V W Y Z Ž
          a á b c č d e é g ǧ h ȟ i í k l m n ŋ o ó p s š t u ú v w y z ž;

Cons = B C Č D G Ǧ H Ȟ K L M N Ŋ P S Š T V W Y Z Ž
       b c č d g ǧ h ȟ k l m n ŋ p s š t v w y z ž;

Rules

"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Deletion rule"
Lx:0 <=> %{infx%}: %>: _ ;
              %{infx%}: %>: Cons: _ ;
              %{infx%}: %>: Cons: Vowel: _ Cons: ;
              where Lx in Letters ;

"First letter movement rule"
%{L1%}:Ly <=> _ [ : - %{infx%}: ]* %{infx%}: %>: Lx: ;
              where Lx in Letters
                    Ly in Letters
              matched ;

"Second letter movement rule"
%{L2%}:Ly <=> _ [ : - %{infx%}: ]* %{infx%}: %>: Cons: Lx: ;
              where Lx in Letters
                    Ly in Letters
              matched ;

"Third letter movement rule"
%{L3%}:Ly <=> _ [ : - %{infx%}: ]* %{infx%}: %>: Cons: Vowel: Lx: Cons: ;
              where Lx in Letters
                    Ly in Letters
              matched ;

!"Fourth letter movement rule"
!%{L4%}:Ly <=> _ [ : - %{infx%}: ]* %{infx%}: %>: Lx: ;
!              where Lx in Letters
!                    Ly in Letters
!              matched ;



! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
